Hawaii statutes.
§431:12-104 Mass merchandising prohibited;
when. (a) No insurer shall mass merchandise insurance to members of any
association or organization formed principally for the purpose of obtaining the
benefits of mass merchandising.

(b) No insurer shall mass merchandise
insurance to employees of any employer which requires the purchase of or
participation in insurance sold on a mass merchandising basis as a condition of
employment, or which subjects any employee to any penalty for failure to
purchase or participate in insurance sold on a mass merchandising basis. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next